Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1819
Pleas of guilty, not guilty, or nolo contendere; when required; failure to plead; effect.

If the issue on the plea in bar be found against the defendant, or if upon arraignment the accused offers no plea in bar, he shall plead guilty, not guilty, or nolo contendere; but if he pleads evasively or stands mute, he shall be taken to have pleaded not guilty.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 451, p. 823;

R.S.1913, § 9095;

C.S.1922, § 10120;

C.S.1929, § 29-1818;

R.S.1943, § 29-1819;

Laws 1953, c. 92, § 1, p. 264.

A plea of nolo contendere entered on advice of counsel when defendant failed to supply counsel with all information that might have been relevant to his defense may not be withdrawn when the record shows that it was entered knowingly, understandingly, and voluntarily. State v. Hurley, 207 Neb. 321, 299 N.W.2d 152 (1980).

The effect of a plea of nolo contendere is the same as a plea of guilty. State v. Neuman, 175 Neb. 832, 125 N.W.2d 5 (1963); State v. Hylton, 175 Neb. 828, 124 N.W.2d 230 (1963).

Judgment of conviction of a felony, rendered upon plea of nolo contendere, is conclusive in disbarment proceeding. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. Stanosheck, 167 Neb. 192, 92 N.W.2d 194 (1958).

Plea entered by court may be withdrawn by defendant. Huette v. State, 87 Neb. 798, 128 N.W. 519 (1910).

Plea of "not guilty," entered by court under this section, binds defendant. Trimble v. State, 61 Neb. 604, 85 N.W. 844 (1901).